Massachusetts, session 194th, H2816.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection 1P of Section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “elect” in line X, the following
words:-
Any member of a contributory retirement system who is engaged in an educational
administrator position and who was previously engaged in supervising the provision of special
education services and ensuring that services specified in each student’s individualized education
program are delivered in any non-public school in the commonwealth, if the tuition of all such
pupils taught was financed in part or in full by the commonwealth may, before the date any
retirement allowance becomes effective for him, establish such service as creditable service by
depositing into the annuity savings fund of the system of which he is a member in one sum, or in
of 2

installments, upon such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe, an amount equal to five
per cent of the compensation received by him during such period of service plus buyback interest
to the date of such deposit for such previous period, or most recent portion thereof, as he may
elect.
of 2